Utah statutes.
17D-3-204.   Commission action if conservation districts are consolidated, divided, or dissolved.

(1)  If two or more conservation districts are consolidated, the commission shall merge the assets and liabilities of the conservation districts that have been consolidated into the conservation district resulting from the consolidation.

(2)  If a conservation district is divided, the commission shall equitably divide the assets and liabilities of the divided conservation district between the conservation districts resulting from the division.

(3)  If a conservation district is dissolved, the commission shall wind up the affairs of the dissolved conservation district.

